public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr inregolari: (re)andar
SFX xA Y 45
SFX xA andar vemo/J2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xA andar vémoi/I2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX xA andar vè/J4I4 andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xA andar vé/J4I4 andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xA andar vemo andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xA andar vè/J4I4S0SlS7D0 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xA andar vé/J4I4S0SlS7D0 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xA andar vègelo/Dl andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xA andar végelo/Dl andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xA andar vègeƚo/D7 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xA andar végeƚo/D7 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xA andar vào/J1I1 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xA andar vàgo/J1 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xA andar vàgomi/I1 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + o
SFX xA andar và/J3 andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vàtu andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vàto andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vàstu andar	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vàa andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + a
SFX xA andar vàga andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vàgi andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar vài andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + i
SFX xA andar và andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + e
SFX xA andar vàe/J1I1 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xA andar vàe/J5j5 andar	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xA andar vàƚo/i5 andar	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xA andar vàlo/I5 andar	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xA andar vàe andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xA andar vàe andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xA andar và/S0SlS7D0 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular	# T9
SFX xA andar vàgelo/Dl andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xA andar vàgeƚo/D7 andar	ds:imperative+present is:second+singular ds:pronomenal+locative	# T9
SFX xA andar von/J2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xA andar voni/I2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T12 + ón
SFX xA andar ven/J2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xA andar veni/I2 andar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T12 + én
SFX xA andar von andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xA andar vone andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xA andar vion andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xA andar vione andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xA andar ven andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xA andar vene andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xA andar vé andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xA andar vede andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX xA andar vege andar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
